zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 自行车用品 > 自行车 > 山地自行车: 越野山地自行车; 速降山地自行车; 耐力山地自行车; 林道山地自行车
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Ciclismo > Bicicletas > Bicicletas de montanha: Bicicletas de montanha de cross-country; Bicicletas de montanha de downhill; Bicicletas de montanha de enduro; Bicicletas de montanha de trail
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Đạp xe > Xe đạp > Xe đạp leo núi: Xe đạp địa hình Cross-Country; Xe đạp địa hình Downhill; Xe đạp địa hình Enduro; Xe đạp địa hình Trail
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Biciklizam > Bicikli > Brdski bicikli: Cross country brdski bicikli; Brdski bicikli za vožnju nizbrdo; Enduro brdski bicikli; Bicikli za planinske staze
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Fietsen > Fietsen > Mountainbikes: Crosscountry-mountainbikes; Downhill-mountainbikes; Enduro-mountainbikes; Trail-mountainbikes
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Kolarstwo > Rowery > Rowery górskie: Rowery górskie cross-country (XC); Rowery górskie downhill; Rowery górskie enduro; Rowery górskie trailowe
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Radfahren > Fahrräder > Mountainbikes: Cross-Country-Mountainbikes; Downhill-Mountainbikes; Enduro-Mountainbikes; Trail-Mountainbikes
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Колоездене > Велосипеди > Планински велосипеди: Кроскънтри планински велосипеди; Велосипеди за спускане; Ендуро планински велосипеди; Трейл планински велосипеди
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปั่นจักรยาน > จักรยาน > จักรยานเสือภูเขา: จักรยานเสือภูเขาครอสคันทรี; จักรยานเสือภูเขาดาวน์ฮิลล์; จักรยานเสือภูเขาเอนดูโร; จักรยานเสือภูเขาเทรล
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kerékpározás > Kerékpárok > Hegyi kerékpárok: Cross-country mountain bike-ok; Downhill mountain bike-ok; Enduro mountain bike-ok; Trail mountain bike-ok
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 單車 > 自行車 > 登山自行車: 越野登山車; 下坡登山車; 耐力賽登山車; 林道登山車
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Cykling > Cykler > Mountainbikes: Cross country-mountainbikes; Downhill-mountainbikes; Enduro-mountainbikes; Trail-mountainbikes
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Vélo > Vélos > Vélos de montagne: VTT de cross-country; VTT de descente; VTT d’enduro; VTT de trail
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Dviračių sportas > Dviračiai > Kalnų dviračiai: Krosinio kalnų dviračiai; Leidimosi kalnų dviračiai; Enduro kalnų dviračiai; Bekelės kalnų dviračiai
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사이클링 > 자전거 > 산악자전거: 크로스컨트리 산악 자전거; 다운힐 산악 자전거; 엔듀로 산악 자전거; 트레일 산악 자전거
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Ciclismo > Bicicletas > Mountain Bikes: Mountain bikes cross-country; Mountain bikes downhill; Mountain bikes enduro; Mountain bikes trail
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Ciclismo > Biciclette > Mountain bike: Mountain bike da cross-country; Mountain bike da downhill; Mountain bike da enduro; Mountain bike da trail
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Bisiklet > Bisikletler > Dağ Bisikletleri: Cross-country dağ bisikletleri; Downhill dağ bisikletleri; Enduro dağ bisikletleri; Trail dağ bisikletleri
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kolesarjenje > Kolesa > Gorska kolesa: Kros gorska kolesa; Downhill gorska kolesa; Gorska kolesa Enduro; Trail gorska kolesa
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Ciclism > Biciclete > Biciclete tip mountain bike: Biciclete de munte cross-country; Biciclete de munte downhill; Biciclete de munte enduro; Biciclete de munte de traseu
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Bicyklovanie > Bicykle > Horské bicykle: Terénne horské bicykle; Zjazdové horské bicykle; Horské enduro bicykle; Horské bicykle
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > サイクリング > 自転車 > マウンテンバイク: クロスカントリーマウンテンバイク; ダウンヒルマウンテンバイク; エンデューロマウンテンバイク; トレイルマウンテンバイク
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Cycling > Bicycles > Mountain Bikes: Cross-Country Mountain Bikes; Downhill Mountain Bikes; Enduro Mountain Bikes; Trail Mountain Bikes
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Езда на велосипеде > Велосипеды > Горные велосипеды: Горные велосипеды для кросс-кантри; Горные велосипеды для даунхилла; Горные велосипеды для эндуро; Трейловые горные велосипеды
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Cyklistika > Jízdní kola > Horská jízdní kola: Cross-country horská kola; Sjezdová horská kola; Enduro horská kola; Trailová horská kola
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sykling > Sykler > Terrengsykler: Cross-country-terrengsykler; Utforsykler; Enduro-terrengsykler; Stisykler
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Pyöräily > Polkupyörät > Vuoripyörät: XC-maastopyörät; Alamäkipyörät; Enduro-maastopyörät; Trail-maastopyörät
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Cykling > Cyklar > Mountainbikes: Cross-country-mountainbikes; Downhill-mountainbikes; Enduro-mountainbikes; Trail-mountainbikes
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ciclismo > Bicicletas > Bicicletas de montaña: Bicicletas de montaña cross country; Bicicletas de montaña de descenso; Bicicletas de montaña enduro; Bicicletas de montaña de trail
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ποδηλασία > Ποδήλατα > Ποδήλατα βουνού: Ποδήλατα βουνού Cross-Country; Ποδήλατα βουνού Downhill; Ποδήλατα βουνού Enduro; Ποδήλατα βουνού Trail